Maryland, session 2026, SB0804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0804*

SENATE BILL 804
5–1201.
(a) [(1)] In this [section] SUBTITLE the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(B) “ACCLIMATIZATION” MEANS THE TEMPORARY ADAPTATION OF THE
BODY TO WORK IN THE HEAT THAT OCCURS GRADUALLY WHEN AN INDIVIDUAL IS
EXPOSED TO HEAT.
[(2)] (C) “Heat–related illness” means a medical condition resulting from
the inability of the body to rid itself of excess heat, including heat rash, heat cramps, heat
exhaustion, heat syncope, and heat stroke.
[(3) “Heat stress” means the net load to which a worker is exposed from the
combined contributions of metabolic heat, environmental factors, and clothing worn that
results in an increase in heat storage in the body, causing body temperature to rise to
sometimes dangerous levels.
(b) (1) On or before October 1, 2022, the Commissioner, in consultation with
the Maryland Occupational Safety and Health Advisory Board, shall develop and adopt
regulations that require employers to protect employees from heat–related illness caused
by heat stress.
(2) Before the Commissioner begins the process for developing and
adopting the regulations required under paragraph (1) of this subsection, Maryland
Occupational Safety and Health shall hold informational hearings in four different
geographical areas of the State for the purpose of obtaining input from interested parties.
(3) In developing the regulations required under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Commissioner shall consider standards created by the National Institute
for Occupational Safety and Health, the American Conference of Governmental Industrial
Hygienists, and the American National Standards Institute.]
(D) “SHADE” MEANS BLOCKAGE OF DIRECT SUNLIGHT.
(E) “TEMPERATURE” MEANS THE DRY BULB TEMPERATURE IN DEGREES
FAHRENHEIT OBTAINABLE BY USING A THERMOMETER TO MEASURE THE OUTDOOR
TEMPERATURE IN AN AREA WHERE THERE IS NO SHADE.
5–1202.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES TO AN EMPLOYER WITH EMPLOYEES WHOSE
EMPLOYMENT ACTIVITIES, INDOOR OR OUTDOOR, EXPOSE EMPLOYEES TO A

SENATE BILL 804 3
TEMPERATURE IN THE AREA WHERE THE EMPLOYEES ARE WORKING OF AT LEAST
80 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) WORK IN CONNECTION WITH AN EMERGENCY THAT REQUIRES THE
INVOLVEMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, FIRE
FIGHTING, RESCUE AND EVACUATION OPERATIONS, OR EMERGENCY RESTORATION
OF ESSENTIAL UTILITIES OR TELECOMMUNICATIONS THAT INVOLVE PROTECTING
LIFE OR PROPERTY;
(2) INCIDENTAL EXPOSURES WHEN AN EMPLOYEE IS NOT REQUIRED
TO PERFORM WORK ACTIVITIES FOR MORE THAN 15 CONSECUTIVE MINUTES PER
HOUR IN AN AREA EXPOSED TO HEAT CONDITIONS EXCEEDING THE APPLICABLE
TEMPERATURE THRESHOLD;
(3) BUILDINGS, STRUCTURES, AND VEHICLES THAT HAVE A
MECHANICAL VENTILATION SYSTEM OR FAN THAT MAINTAINS THE TEMPERATURE
BELOW 80 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT; OR
(4) TEMPORARY AND UNANTICIPATED HEAT CONDITIONS RESULTING
FROM AN EMERGENCY OR EQUIPMENT FAILURE IF:
(I) THE EMPLOYEE IS NOT REGULARLY EXPOSED TO HEAT
CONDITIONS EXCEEDING THE APPLICABLE TEMPERATURE THRESHOLD; AND
(II) THE EMPLOYER TAKES REASONABLE STEPS TO ABATE THE
HEAT EXPOSURE AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE.
5–1203.
(A) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL DEVELOP, IMPLEMENT, AND MAINTAIN AN
EXCESSIVE HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS PREVENTION PLAN FOR EMPLOYEES.
(B) THE PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
SPECIFY:
(1) SUBJECT TO § 5–1205(D) OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) HOW SUFFICIENT AMOUNTS OF DRINKING WATER WILL BE
PROVIDED TO EMPLOYEES; AND

SENATE BILL 804
(II) HOW EMPLOYEES WILL BE PROVIDED SUFFICIENT
OPPORTUNITIES AND ENCOURAGEMENT TO STAY HYDRATED BY DRINKING WATER;
(2) HOW TO RECOGNIZE THE SYMPTOMS OF HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS,
INCLUDING HEAT EXHAUSTION AND HEAT STROKE;
(3) HOW TO RESPOND TO SUSPECTED HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS,
INCLUDING HEAT EXHAUSTION AND HEAT STROKE;
(4) SUBJECT TO § 5–1205(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, HOW EMPLOYEES
WILL BE PROVIDED WITH SUFFICIENT TIME AND SPACE TO REST IN SHADED OR
COOL, CLIMATE–CONTROLLED AREAS TO COOL OFF;
(5) HOW THE EMPLOYER WILL IMPLEMENT REST BREAK SCHEDULES
AS NECESSARY;
(6) HOW THE EMPLOYER WILL CONSIDER ENVIRONMENTAL
CONDITIONS, WORKLOAD, REQUIRED CLOTHING, PERSONAL PROTECTIVE
EQUIPMENT, AND ALTERNATIVE COOLING AND CONTROL MEASURES WHEN
DETERMINING REST BREAK SCHEDULES;
(7) HOW EMPLOYEES WILL BE ENCOURAGED TO TAKE REST BREAKS
AS NEEDED TO PREVENT HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS;
(8) HOW EMPLOYEES WILL BE TRAINED ON THE HAZARDS OF HEAT
EXPOSURE AND THE NECESSARY STEPS TO PREVENT HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS;
(9) THE USE AND MAINTENANCE OF ALTERNATIVE COOLING AND
CONTROL MEASURES USED TO MANAGE HEAT;
(10) PROCEDURES FOR HEAT ACCLIMATIZATION IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 5–1204 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(11) PROCEDURES FOR HIGH–HEAT CONDITIONS IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 5–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(12) THE EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
5–1207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL MAKE THE PLAN REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE TO:
(1) EMPLOYEES; AND

SENATE BILL 804 5
(2) THE COMMISSIONER ON REQUEST.
5–1204.
(A) (1) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE FOR ACCLIMATIZATION OF AN
EMPLOYEE NEWLY EXPOSED TO HEAT IN THE WORKPLACE OR RETURNING TO WORK
FOLLOWING AN ABSENCE FROM THE WORKPLACE OF AT LEAST 7 CONSECUTIVE
DAYS.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, AN EMPLOYEE IS NOT
CONSIDERED NEWLY EXPOSED TO HEAT IF THE EMPLOYEE HAS BEEN EXPOSED TO
COMPARABLE OCCUPATIONAL HEAT CONDITIONS WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING 7 DAYS, EVEN IF THE EXPOSURE OCCURRED AT A DIFFERENT WORKSITE
OR WHILE EMPLOYED BY A DIFFERENT EMPLOYER.
(B) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, DEVELOP AND
IMPLEMENT A WRITTEN ACCLIMATIZATION PLAN; OR
(2) FOLLOW THE ACCLIMATIZATION PLAN DEVELOPED BY THE
NATIONAL INSTITUTE FOR OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH.
(C) AN EMPLOYER SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING FACTORS WHEN
DEVELOPING AN ACCLIMATIZATION PLAN UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS
SECTION:
(1) THE DIFFERENCE IN HEAT TOLERANCE BETWEEN ACCLIMATIZED
AND NONACCLIMATIZED WORKERS;
(2) THE DIFFERENCES IN HEAT TOLERANCE BASED ON AN
INDIVIDUAL’S PERSONAL FITNESS LEVEL;
(3) THE EFFECTS OF CLOTHING AND PERSONAL PROTECTIVE
EQUIPMENT;
(4) THE PERSONAL AND ENVIRONMENTAL RISK FACTORS THAT PUT
WORKERS AT A HIGHER RISK OF HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS;
(5) PROCEDURES FOR REACCLIMATIZING A WORKER DUE TO
CHANGES IN WEATHER OR THE WORKER SPENDING A SPECIFIED TIME PERIOD AWAY
FROM THE JOB;

SENATE BILL 804
(6) THE USE AND MAINTENANCE OF AUXILIARY COOLING SYSTEMS
SUCH AS WATER–COOLED GARMENTS, AIR–COOLED GARMENTS, COOLING VESTS,
AND WETTED OVERGARMENTS; AND
(7) THE EFFECT OF EXPOSURE TO DIRECT SUNLIGHT.
(D) AN EMPLOYER SHALL SUBMIT THE ACCLIMATIZATION PLAN
DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION TO THE COMMISSIONER.
5–1205.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, ON A
WORKSITE WHERE AN EMPLOYEE OF ONE OR MORE SUBCONTRACTORS IS PRESENT,
THE PERSON, SUCH AS A GENERAL CONTRACTOR, THAT HAS ACTUAL CONTROL OVER
THE WORKSITE OR WORKING CONDITIONS OF THE WORKSITE SHALL BE
RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYER
SHALL MONITOR THE TEMPERATURE THROUGHOUT THE WORK SHIFT IN AREAS
WHERE EMPLOYEES PERFORM WORK BY:
(I) DIRECTLY MEASURING THE TEMPERATURE AND HUMIDITY
AT THE SAME TIME AND LOCATION IN THE AREAS WHERE EMPLOYEES PERFORM
WORK; OR
(II) USING LOCAL WEATHER DATA REPORTED BY THE NATIONAL
WEATHER SERVICE OR OTHER RECOGNIZED SOURCE TO DETERMINE THE
TEMPERATURE.
(2) AN EMPLOYER WHOSE EMPLOYEES WORK IN BUILDINGS AND
STRUCTURES THAT DO NOT HAVE A MECHANICAL VENTILATION SYSTEM SHALL
DIRECTLY MEASURE THE TEMPERATURE AND HUMIDITY AT THE SAME TIME AND
LOCATION IN AREAS WHERE EMPLOYEES PERFORM WORK.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (3) AND (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE SHADED AREAS TO EXPOSED
EMPLOYEES AS CLOSE TO THE WORK AREA AS PRACTICABLE.
(2) SHADED AREAS SHALL:
(I) BE OUTSIDE, OPEN, AND EXPOSED TO AIR ON AT LEAST
THREE SIDES;

SENATE BILL 804 7
(II) PREVENT CONTRIBUTING HEAT SOURCES FROM REDUCING
EFFECTIVENESS;
(III) BE SUFFICIENTLY SIZED FOR THE NUMBER OF EMPLOYEES
USING THE SHADED AREA;
(IV) BE ARRANGED IN A CONFIGURATION THAT ALLOWS
EMPLOYEES TO SIT IN NORMAL POSTURE; AND
(V) ACCOMMODATE THE REMOVAL AND STORAGE OF PERSONAL
PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT DURING PERIODS OF USE.
(3) IF CREATING OUTDOOR SHADE IS DEMONSTRABLY INFEASIBLE
OR UNSAFE IN THE WORK AREA, THE EMPLOYER SHALL IMPLEMENT ALTERNATIVE
COOLING AND CONTROL MEASURES THAT PROVIDE EQUIVALENT PROTECTION TO
SHADE.
(4) AN EMPLOYER MAY PROVIDE COOLING WITH AN INDOOR
MECHANICAL VENTILATION SYSTEM AS AN ALTERNATIVE TO OUTDOOR SHADE
PROVIDED THAT THE INDOOR SPACE SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF
PARAGRAPH (2)(II) THROUGH (V) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) (1) AN EMPLOYER SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE DRINKING WATER AT NO COST TO EXPOSED
EMPLOYEES AS CLOSE TO THE WORK AREA AS PRACTICABLE; AND
(II) MAKE AVAILABLE AT LEAST 32 OUNCES OF DRINKING
WATER PER HOUR TO EACH EXPOSED EMPLOYEE PER WORK DAY.
(2) AN EMPLOYER IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE THE ENTIRE
DRINKING WATER SUPPLY AT THE BEGINNING OF AN EMPLOYEE’S SHIFT BUT SHALL
MAKE DRINKING WATER AVAILABLE AT ALL TIMES WHILE WORK IS BEING
PERFORMED.
5–1206.
(A) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL IMPLEMENT HIGH–HEAT PROCEDURES WHEN
THE TEMPERATURE IS AT LEAST 90 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT IN THE AREA WHERE
THE WORK IS BEING PERFORMED.

SENATE BILL 804
(B) THE HIGH–HEAT PROCEDURES SHALL INCLUDE A WORK AND REST
SCHEDULE TO PROTECT EMPLOYEES FROM HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS THAT IS
ADJUSTED FOR ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS, WORKLOAD, AND IMPACT OF
REQUIRED CLOTHING OR PERSONAL PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE HIGH–HEAT PROCEDURES SHALL INCLUDE A REST PERIOD:
(I) DETERMINED BY THE EMPLOYER TO BE APPROPRIATE FOR
THE INDUSTRY, WORKLOAD, WORKING ENVIRONMENT, AND TEMPERATURE; OR
(II) AS PROVIDED FOR IN THE CURRENT NATIONAL INSTITUTE
FOR OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH RECOMMENDATIONS FOR WORK AND
REST SCHEDULES TO MANAGE HEAT EXPOSURE.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYER
IS NOT REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE
EMPLOYER CAN DEMONSTRATE EFFECTIVE HEAT MANAGEMENT AND PROTECTION
FROM HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS THROUGH ALTERNATIVE COOLING AND CONTROL
MEASURES.
(3) IF AN EMPLOYER USES ALTERNATIVE COOLING AND CONTROL
MEASURES UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE MEASURES:
(I) SHALL BE READILY AVAILABLE AND ACCESSIBLE TO
EMPLOYEES AT ALL TIMES WORK IS BEING PERFORMED;
(II) SHALL BE DESCRIBED IN WRITING; AND
(III) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, MAY NOT SUPERSEDE ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) REST PERIODS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) MAY RUN CONCURRENTLY WITH A SCHEDULED REST OR MEAL
PERIOD OR A REST OR MEAL PERIOD REQUIRED UNDER ANY OTHER PROVISION OF
LAW; AND
(2) SHALL BE TAKEN IN THE SHADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
5–1205(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 804 9
(E) AN EMPLOYER MAY NOT DISCOURAGE EMPLOYEES FROM TAKING REST
BREAKS REQUIRED BY HIGH–HEAT PROCEDURES IMPLEMENTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION.
(F) WHEN HIGH–HEAT PROCEDURES ARE IN EFFECT, AN EMPLOYER SHALL
MONITOR EXPOSED EMPLOYEES FOR SIGNS OF HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS WITH
REGULAR COMMUNICATION BY:
(1) TELEPHONE OR RADIO;
(2) A BUDDY SYSTEM; OR
(3) OTHER EFFECTIVE MEANS OF OBSERVATION.
(G) AN EMPLOYER SHALL MAKE HIGH–HEAT PROCEDURES AVAILABLE IN
WRITING IN A LANGUAGE AND MANNER THAT ALL EMPLOYEES OF THE EMPLOYER
CAN UNDERSTAND.
5–1207.
EACH EMPLOYER SHALL IMPLEMENT AN EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLAN THAT
INCLUDES PROCEDURES FOR:
(1) ENSURING EFFECTIVE AND ACCESSIBLE MEANS OF
COMMUNICATION AT ALL TIMES AT THE WORKSITE TO ENABLE AN EMPLOYEE TO
CONTACT A SUPERVISOR OR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES;
(2) RESPONDING TO SIGNS AND SYMPTOMS OF POSSIBLE
HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS IN EMPLOYEES;
(3) MONITORING AND PROVIDING CARE TO EMPLOYEES WHO ARE
EXHIBITING SYMPTOMS OF HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS; AND
(4) CONTACTING EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES AND, IF
NECESSARY, TRANSPORTING EMPLOYEES TO A LOCATION ACCESSIBLE TO
EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES.
5–1208.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “HEAT STRESS” MEANS THE NET LOAD TO WHICH A
WORKER IS EXPOSED FROM THE COMBINED CONTRIBUTIONS OF METABOLIC HEAT,
ENVIRONMENTAL FACTORS, AND CLOTHING WORN THAT RESULTS IN AN INCREASE

SENATE BILL 804
IN HEAT STORAGE IN THE BODY, CAUSING BODY TEMPERATURE TO RISE TO
SOMETIMES DANGEROUS LEVELS.
(B) EACH EMPLOYER SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE INITIAL HEAT STRESS TRAINING TO EMPLOYEES,
INCLUDING SUPERVISORS, BEFORE AN EMPLOYEE’S FIRST EXPOSURE TO HEAT;
(2) RETRAIN EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING SUPERVISORS:
(I) AT LEAST ANNUALLY BEFORE THE EMPLOYEES ARE FIRST
EXPOSED FOR THE YEAR TO CONDITIONS THAT WOULD SUBJECT THE EMPLOYEES
AND EMPLOYER TO THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING CONFIRMATION BY A MEDICAL
PROFESSIONAL THAT ANOTHER EMPLOYEE SUFFERED A HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS IF
THE EMPLOYEE:
1. SUFFERED THE HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS IN THE
COURSE OF EMPLOYMENT; AND
2. WORKS IN THE SAME HEAT CONDITIONS TO WHICH
THE EMPLOYEES TO BE RETRAINED ARE EXPOSED;
(3) PRESENT TRAINING IN A LANGUAGE AND MANNER THAT ALL
EMPLOYEES OF THE EMPLOYER CAN UNDERSTAND;
(4) ENSURE THAT TRAINING INCLUDES, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) THE WORK AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS THAT
AFFECT HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS;
(II) THE PERSONAL RISK FACTORS THAT AFFECT
HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS;
(III) THE CONCEPT, IMPORTANCE, AND METHODS OF
ACCLIMATIZATION;
(IV) THE IMPORTANCE OF FREQUENT CONSUMPTION OF WATER
AND REST BREAKS IN PREVENTING HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS;

SENATE BILL 804 11
(V) THE TYPES OF HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS, SIGNS AND
SYMPTOMS OF HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS, AND THE APPROPRIATE FIRST AID AND
EMERGENCY RESPONSE MEASURES;
(VI) THE IMPORTANCE OF AND PROCEDURES FOR EMPLOYEES
IMMEDIATELY REPORTING TO THE EMPLOYER SIGNS AND SYMPTOMS OF
HEAT–RELATED ILLNESS; AND
(VII) THE EMPLOYER’S PROCEDURES AND THE REQUIREMENTS
FOR COMPLYING WITH THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(5) MAINTAIN TRAINING RECORDS FOR 1 YEAR FROM THE DATE ON
WHICH THE TRAINING OCCURRED.
(C) THE TRAINING RECORDS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE NAMES OF THE EMPLOYEES TRAINED;
(2) THE DATES OF THE TRAINING SESSIONS; AND
(3) A SUMMARY OR AN OUTLINE OF THE CONTENT OF THE TRAINING
SESSIONS.
(D) THE TRAINING RECORDS SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO THE
COMMISSIONER ON REQUEST.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.